North Dakota, session 69, SB2183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 9 of section 39-06.1-06 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
9. For a violation of a highway construction zone speed limit under subsection 2 of section
39-09-02, a fee of eighty one hundred fifty dollars for one through ten miles per hour over the
posted speed; and eighty one hundred fifty dollars plus two dollars for each mile per hour over
ten miles per hour over the limit, unless a greater fee would be applicable under this section.
The fee in this subsection does not apply to a highway construction zone unless individuals
engaged in construction are present at the time and place of the violation and the posted
speed limit sign states "Minimum Fee $80$150".

S. B. NO. 2183 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2183.
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 3 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 88 Nays 6 Absent 0
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State